Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Chapter 13 Wyoming Office of Homeland Security

The 2005 amendment

substituted “Wyoming Office of Homeland Security” for “Wyoming Emergency Management Office” as the chapter heading.

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Adequate state remedy for lethal-gas evacuation. —

A property owner, who was ordered by a county resolution to evacuate his home because of the seepage of lethal gases, was not deprived of a federally-secured property right, because his property was taken during an emergency for which the state of Wyoming plainly provided an adequate post-deprivation remedy. Miller v. Campbell County, 722 F. Supp. 687, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11685 (D. Wyo. 1989), aff'd, 945 F.2d 348, 1991 U.S. App. LEXIS 22225 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1991).